Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Chapter 55

Bureau of Ethics and Campaign Finance

4-55-101. Creation — Composition — Governance — Attachment to department of state — Meetings.

There is created, as an independent entity of state government, the bureau of ethics and campaign finance, referred to in this chapter as the “bureau.”

The bureau shall be composed of two (2) divisions as follows:

The Tennessee registry of election finance, established by title 2, chapter 10, part 2; and

The Tennessee ethics commission, established by title 3, chapter 6, part 1.

The bureau shall be governed by a board of directors to be composed of the six (6) members of the registry of election finance and the six (6) members of the ethics commission.

The bureau of ethics and campaign finance shall be attached to the department of state for all administrative matters relating to receipts, disbursements, expense accounts, budget, audit and other related items. The autonomy of the bureau and its authority is absolute and the secretary of state shall have no administrative or supervisory control over the bureau.

The board of directors shall elect a chair from among its membership. The chair shall serve in that capacity for one (1) year and shall be eligible for reelection. The chair shall preside at all meetings and shall have all the powers and privileges of the other members.

Eight (8) members of the board of directors shall constitute a quorum and eight (8) affirmative votes are required for any action by the board of directors. Special meetings shall be called by the chair on the chair's initiative or upon the written request of eight (8) members. Members shall receive written notice three (3) days in advance of a special meeting. Notice shall be served personally or left at a member's usual place of residence and shall specify the purpose, time and place of the meeting. No matters unrelated to the specified purpose may be considered without a specific waiver by all members of the board of directors.

Acts 2009, ch. 556, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2009, ch. 556, § 1 purported to add this chapter as chapter 54, §§4-54-101 —4-54-106. Acts 2009, ch. 435, §§ 2-7 added a new chapter 54, §§4-54-101 —4-54-106; therefore, the code commission added this chapter as chapter 55, §§4-55-101 —4-55-106.

Compiler's Notes. The bureau of ethics and campaign finance, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2021. See §§4-29-112,4-29-242.

4-55-102. Employees of the bureau.

The board of directors of the bureau of ethics and campaign finance shall appoint a full-time executive director who shall serve at the pleasure of the board of directors. Other employees of the bureau shall be employed on recommendation of the executive director with the approval of the board. The executive director and all other employees of the bureau shall constitute the staff of the bureau and its two (2) divisions. The board of directors of the bureau may call on the office of the state coordinator of elections for such advice, documents or services as it may require.

Employees of the bureau shall not possess state service status, but the employees shall be subject to personnel policies applicable to state employees generally, such as leave, compensation, classification and travel requests.

Neither the executive director nor any other employee of the bureau, nor any member of an employee's immediate family as defined in § 3-6-301, shall, during the period of such employment:

Be allowed to hold or qualify for elective office to any state or local public office as defined in § 2-10-102;

Be an officer of any political party or political committee;

Permit the employee's name to be used or make contributions in support of or in opposition to any candidate or proposition, except that an employee's immediate family may make campaign contributions in support of or in opposition to any candidate or proposition;

Participate in any way in any election campaign;

Lobby or employ a lobbyist; provided, that this subdivision (c)(5) shall not prohibit the executive director from the performance of the executive director's duties; or

Be employed by any elected officeholder, either in an official capacity or as an individual, or be employed by any business in which an elected officeholder has any direct input concerning employment decisions.

Acts 2009, ch. 556, § 1; 2012, ch. 800, § 49.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2009, ch. 556, § 1 purported to add this chapter as chapter 54, §§4-54-101 —4-54-105. Acts 2009, ch. 435, §§ 2-7 added a new chapter 54, §§4-54-101 —4-54-106; therefore, the code commission added this chapter as chapter 55, §§4-55-101 —4-55-106.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 800, § 1 provided that the act, which amended subsection (b), shall be known and cited as the “Tennessee Excellence, Accountability, and Management (T.E.A.M.) Act of 2012.”

4-55-103. Duties of the bureau.

The bureau of ethics and campaign finance shall:

Promulgate such rules and regulations, pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in chapter 5 of this title, as are necessary to implement title 2, chapter 10; title 3, chapter 6; title 8, chapter 17; and title 8, chapter 50, part 5; provided, however, that all rules that relate exclusively to the registry of election finance shall be initiated and proposed to the board of directors of the bureau by a majority of the members of the registry of election finance and all rules that relate exclusively to the ethics commission shall be initiated and proposed to the board of directors of the bureau by a majority of the members of the ethics commission. Subject to the limitations contained in this subdivision (1), all rulemaking authority delegated by this chapter shall be vested in the bureau of ethics and campaign finance;

Collect or receive all filings required to be made pursuant to title 2, chapter 10; title 3, chapter 6; title 8, chapter 17; or title 8, chapter 50, part 5, and assign the issues contained in title 2, chapter 10; title 3, chapter 6; title 8, chapter 17; or title 8, chapter 50, part 5, as appropriate, to the registry of election finance or the ethics commission, and further collect all fees, fines and moneys assessed by the registry of election finance or the ethics commission; and

Promulgate rules prescribing all forms for filings, complaints, registrations, statements and other documents that are required to be filed under the laws administered and enforced by the ethics commission or the registry of election finance, with the objective of making the documents as simple and understandable as possible for both the person filing the document and the average citizen of this state.

Acts 2009, ch. 556, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2009, ch. 556, § 1 purported to add this chapter as chapter 54, §§4-54-101 —4-54-105. Acts 2009, ch. 435, §§ 2-7 added a new chapter 54, §§4-54-101 —4-54-106; therefore, the code commission added this chapter as chapter 55, §§4-55-101 —4-55-106.

4-55-104. Disposition of all fees, appropriations and penalties.

All fees imposed by the registry of election finance and the ethics commission and collected by the bureau of ethics and campaign finance, as well as all appropriations made to the bureau, shall be deposited by the state treasurer in a separate account exclusively for the bureau, and shall be used by the bureau to defray expenses necessary to administer this part; title 2, chapter 10; title 3, chapter 6; title 8, chapter 17; and title 8, chapter 50, part 5, including the payment of salaries to employees, the purchase of supplies and any other necessary expenses. Unexpended and unobligated fees remaining in this account at the end of any fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund, but shall remain available for use by the bureau. Penalties collected by the bureau shall be deposited into the state general fund.

Acts 2009, ch. 556, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2009, ch. 556, § 1 purported to add this chapter as chapter 54, §§4-54-101 —4-54-105. Acts 2009, ch. 435, §§ 2-7 added a new chapter 54, §§4-54-101 —4-54-106; therefore, the code commission added this chapter as chapter 55, §§4-55-101 —4-55-106.

4-55-105. Regulatory jurisdiction of members of the registry of election finance and of members of the ethics commission.

Except as provided in this chapter specifically to the contrary, the members of the registry of election finance shall exercise regulatory jurisdiction over matters relating exclusively to the registry pursuant to title 2, chapter 10, free from interference by members of the ethics commission.

Except as provided in this chapter specifically to the contrary, the members of the ethics commission shall exercise regulatory jurisdiction over matters relating exclusively to the ethics commission pursuant to title 2, chapter 10, part 1; title 3, chapter 6; title 8, chapter 17; and title 8, chapter 50, part 5, free from interference by members of the registry of election finance.

Acts 2009, ch. 556, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2009, ch. 556, § 1 purported to add this chapter as chapter 54, §§4-54-101 —4-54-105. Acts 2009, ch. 435, §§ 2-7 added a new chapter 54, §§4-54-101 —4-54-106; therefore, the code commission added this chapter as chapter 55, §§4-55-101 —4-55-106.

4-55-106. Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the general assembly that:

The current members of the registry of election finance and the ethics commission shall remain members of each respective entity and shall comprise the bureau of ethics and campaign finance created by this chapter until the expiration of their terms or resignation;

The executive director of the registry of election finance, on June 30, 2009, shall be the initial executive director of the bureau of ethics and campaign finance;

From July 1, 2009, through and including August 10, 2009, the bureau of ethics and campaign finance is authorized to undertake actions necessary on behalf of the Tennessee ethics commission and the Tennessee registry of election finance to effectuate the transition of such entities into divisions of the bureau;

Staff positions of the Tennessee ethics commission as of June 30, 2009, shall be transferred to the bureau of ethics and campaign finance through and including August 10, 2009; provided, however, that the bureau of ethics and campaign finance shall reclassify the position of the executive director of the Tennessee ethics commission. With the approval of the bureau, the executive director of the bureau may reclassify or eliminate staff positions of the ethics commission after August 10, 2009, as the executive director deems necessary for the efficient and effective operations of the bureau. No vacant staff position within the bureau shall be filled from July 1, 2009, through August 10, 2009;

All rules of the registry of election finance and the ethics commission in effect on June 30, 2009, shall remain in full force and effect as rules of the bureau of ethics and campaign finance until modified or repealed; and

The registry of election finance and ethics commission shall be audited in conjunction with the audit of the bureau of ethics and campaign finance by the comptroller of the treasury for purposes of title 4, chapter 29.

Acts 2009, ch. 556, § 29.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2009, ch. 556, § 1 purported to add this chapter as chapter 54, §§4-54-101 —4-54-105. Acts 2009, ch. 435, §§ 2-7 added a new chapter 54, §§4-54-101 —4-54-106; therefore, the code commission added this chapter as chapter 55, §§4-55-101 —4-55-106.